Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2081.
Repealed. 1997, No. 40, § 27.

§ 2081a.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

[Repealed.]

“Disciplinary action” or “disciplinary cases” includes any action taken by the administrative law officer appointed under

3 V.S.A. § 129(j)

against a licensee or applicant premised upon a finding of wrongdoing or unprofessional conduct by the licensee or applicant. It includes all sanctions of any kind, including obtaining injunctions, suspending or revoking licenses, issuing conditions on practice, warnings, and other similar sanctions.

“Distance consultation” means the rendering of professional or expert opinion or advice to a licensed physical therapist, including the review or transfer of patient records or related information by means of audio, video, or data communications.

“Physical therapist” means a person who has met all the conditions of this chapter and is licensed for the practice of physical therapy in this State.

“Physical therapist assistant” means a person who has met the conditions of this chapter and is licensed to perform selected physical therapy interventions and related tasks that have been assigned by the supervising physical therapist.

“Physical therapy” means the care and services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist who is licensed pursuant to this chapter.

“Physical therapy aide” means a person, trained under the direction of a physical therapist, who performs designated and supervised routine physical therapy tasks.

“Practice of physical therapy” means:

examining, evaluating, and testing, in order to determine a plan of care inclusive of appropriate therapeutic interventions and expected outcome and effect of the interventions of individuals with:

mechanical, physiological, and developmental impairments;

functional limitations in physical movement and mobility;

disabilities; and

other movement-related conditions;

alleviating impairments and functional limitations in physical movement and mobility and disabilities by developing, implementing, and modifying treatment interventions; or

reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation, and disability related to physical movement and mobility, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and wellness related to movement and function.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 40

, § 25; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 54;

2007, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2009;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 2082.
Prohibition; offenses.

No person shall:

practice or attempt to practice physical therapy or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State without first having obtained a license; or

use in connection with the person’s name or business the words “physical therapy,” “physical therapist,” “physical therapist assistant,” “physiotherapy,” “physiotherapist,” the initials “PT,” “PTA,” “DPT,” or any letters, words, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter; or

practice or attempt to practice physical therapy during license revocation or suspension.

[Repealed.]

A person violating any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

A physical therapist shall use the letters “PT” in connection with the physical therapist’s name or place of business to denote licensure, and a physical therapist assistant shall use the letters “PTA.”

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 55;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2083.
Exemptions from licensure.

The following persons shall be permitted to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in this State without obtaining a license under this chapter upon the following conditions:

students enrolled in accredited physical therapist or physical therapist assistant educational programs, while engaged in completing a clinical requirement for graduation, which must be performed under the supervision and direction of a licensed physical therapist;

physical therapists licensed in other jurisdictions while enrolled in this State in postprofessional educational programs that include the evaluation and treatment of patients as part of their experience required for credit, as long as the student’s practice is limited to the scope of the educational program;

physical therapists and physical therapist assistants employed in the U.S. Armed Services, U.S. Public Health Service, U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, or by another federal agency;

physical therapists or physical therapist assistants licensed or regulated in another jurisdiction of the United States or credentialed to practice physical therapy in another country if that person is teaching, demonstrating, or providing physical therapy in connection with teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than 60 days in a calendar year;

a physical therapist who is licensed in another jurisdiction of the United States if that person is providing distance consultation to a physical therapist licensed pursuant to this chapter;

a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed in another jurisdiction of the United States or credentialed in another country, if that person by contract or employment is providing physical therapy to individuals affiliated with or employed by an athletic team, an athletic organization, or a performing arts company temporarily practicing, competing, or performing in the State for no more than 60 days in a calendar year.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 56;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 278.

§ 2084.
Construction.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the right of a practitioner of another occupation that is regulated by this State from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions of his or her profession.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2085.
Repealed. 2007, No. 141 (Adj. Sess.), § 3(b).

§ 2086.
Patient care management.

A physical therapist shall be professionally responsible and legally liable for all aspects of the physical therapy care of each of his or her patients. The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall identify by rule physical therapy services that only a physical therapist may perform. At a minimum, a physical therapist shall provide:

the initial examination and documentation for each of his or her patients;

periodic reexamination and documentation of each of his or her patients;

the documented discharge of the patient, including the response to therapeutic intervention at the time of discharge.

A physical therapist shall ensure the qualifications of all physical therapist assistants and physical therapy aides under his or her direction or supervision.

For each of his or her patients on each date of treatment, a physical therapist shall provide all of the therapeutic intervention that requires the expertise of a physical therapist and shall determine the use of physical therapist assistants or physical therapy aides who provide for the delivery of care that is safe, effective, and efficient, provided the assigned acts, tasks, or procedures do not exceed the person’s education or training and provided:

A physical therapist assistant shall work under a physical therapist’s supervision. A physical therapist assistant may document care pursuant to the existing treatment plan from the supervising physical therapist.

A physical therapist may use physical therapy aides for designated routine tasks. A physical therapy aide shall work under the on-site supervision of a physical therapist who is continuously on site and present at the facility, who is immediately available to assist the person being supervised in the services being performed, and who maintains continued involvement in appropriate aspects of each treatment session in which a component of treatment is assigned. This supervision by the physical therapist may extend to off-site supervision of the aide only when the physical therapy aide is accompanying and working directly with a physical therapist assistant with a specific patient or when performing nonpatient-related tasks.

A physical therapist’s responsibility for patient care management shall include accurate documentation of and billing for the services provided.

A physical therapist shall be responsible for communicating the status of a patient’s progress and other relevant information to the patient’s referring health care professional unless the patient declines to authorize release of the patient’s physical therapy records.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2009.